Nebraska, session 109, LB994.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The department shall, no later than April 15, 2027,
recalculate the parole eligibility dates of all committed offenders who
were incarcerated on or after July 1, 2011, to reflect the changes to
section 83-1,107 made by this legislative bill.
(2) Such recalculations shall be completed in coordination with the
Board of Parole, using a phased implementation schedule to prevent
administrative overload and ensure public safety.
(3) No person shall be denied eligibility for parole solely because
of an administrative delay in recalculation under this section.
(4) Any individual on parole as of the effective date of this act
who was discharged from custody after July 1, 2011, and before the
effective date of this act, whose parole eligibility would have been
modified by this legislative bill, may request the Board of Parole to
reduce his or her parole term accordingly.
(5) The Legislature declares that the purpose of the changes made to
section 83-1,107 by this legislative bill is to clarify that good-time
reductions apply to both tentative release dates and parole eligibility
dates.
Sec. 2. Section 83-1,107, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
83-1,107 (1)(a) Within sixty days after initial classification and
assignment of any offender committed to the department, all available
information regarding such committed offender shall be reviewed and a
committed offender department-approved personalized program plan document
shall be drawn up. The document shall specifically describe the
department-approved personalized program plan and the specific goals the
department expects the committed offender to achieve. The document shall
also contain a realistic schedule for completion of the department-
approved personalized program plan. The department-approved personalized
program plan shall be developed with the active participation of the
committed offender. The department shall provide programs to allow
-2-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
compliance by the committed offender with the department-approved
personalized program plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education, including teaching such
classes by qualified offenders;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs; and
(v) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the
department.
(b) A modification in the department-approved personalized program
plan may be made to account for the increased or decreased abilities of
the committed offender or the availability of any program. Any
modification shall be made only after notice is given to the committed
offender. The department may not impose disciplinary action upon any
committed offender solely because of the committed offender's failure to
comply with the department-approved personalized program plan, but such
failure may be considered by the board in its deliberations on whether or
not to grant parole to a committed offender.
(2)(a) The department shall reduce the term of a committed offender
by six months for each year of the offender's term and pro rata for any
part thereof which is less than a year.
(b) In addition to reductions granted in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, the department shall reduce the term of a committed offender by
three days on the first day of each month following a twelve-month period
of incarceration within the department during which the offender has not
been found guilty of (i) a Class I or Class II offense or (ii) more than
three Class III offenses under the department's disciplinary code.
Reductions earned under this subdivision shall not be subject to forfeit
or withholding by the department.
-3-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
(c) The total reductions under this subsection shall be credited
from the date of sentence, which shall include any term of confinement
prior to sentence and commitment as provided pursuant to section
83-1,106. Such reductions , and shall be deducted from the:
(i) Minimum term, other than a mandatory minimum, to determine
parole eligibility; and
(ii) Maximum maximum term, to determine the date when discharge from
the custody of the state becomes mandatory.
(3) While the offender is in the custody of the department,
reductions of terms granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this
section may be forfeited, withheld, and restored by the chief executive
officer of the facility with the approval of the director after the
offender has been notified regarding the charges of misconduct.
(4) The department, in consultation with the board, shall ensure
that a release or reentry plan is complete or near completion when the
offender has served at least eighty percent of his or her sentence. For
purposes of this subsection, release or reentry plan means a
comprehensive and individualized strategic plan to ensure an individual's
safe and effective transition or reentry into the community to which he
or she resides with the primary goal of reducing recidivism. At a
minimum, the release or reentry plan shall include, but not be limited
to, consideration of the individual's housing needs, medical or mental
health care needs, and transportation and job needs and shall address an
individual's barriers to successful release or reentry in order to
prevent recidivism. The release or reentry plan does not include an
individual's programming needs included in the individual's personalized
program plan for use inside the prison. However, the department shall
include in the release or reentry plan information regarding the
individual's progress on the individual's personalized program plan for
use inside the prison.
(5)(a) The department shall make treatment programming available to
-4-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
committed offenders as provided in section 83-1,110.01 and shall include
continuing participation in such programming as part of each offender's
department-approved personalized program plan developed under subsection
(1) of this section.
(b) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be provided
with the community standard of mental health care. The mental health care
shall utilize evidence-based therapy models that include an evaluation
component to track the effectiveness of interventions.
(c) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be evaluated
before release to ensure that adequate monitoring and treatment of the
committed offender will take place or, if appropriate, that a commitment
proceeding under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex
Offender Commitment Act will take place.
(6)(a) Within thirty days after any committed offender has been
paroled, all available information regarding such parolee shall be
reviewed and a case plan document shall be drawn up and approved by the
department. The document shall specifically describe the approved case
plan and the specific goals the department expects the parolee to
achieve. The document shall also contain a realistic schedule for
completion of the approved case plan. The approved case plan shall be
developed with the active participation of the parolee. During the term
of parole, the parolee shall comply with the approved case plan and the
department shall provide programs to allow compliance by the parolee with
the approved case plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs;
(v) Community service programs; and
-5-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
(vi) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the
department.
(b) A modification in the approved case plan may be made to account
for the increased or decreased abilities of the parolee or the
availability of any program. Any modification shall be made only after
notice is given to the parolee. Intentional failure to comply with the
approved case plan by any parolee as scheduled for any year, or pro rata
part thereof, shall cause disciplinary action to be taken by the
department resulting in the forfeiture of up to a maximum of three
months' good time for the scheduled year.
(7) While the offender is in the custody of the board, reductions of
terms granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be
forfeited, withheld, and restored by the director upon the recommendation
of the board after the offender has been notified regarding the charges
of misconduct or breach of the conditions of parole.
(8) Good time or other reductions of sentence granted under the
provisions of any law prior to July 1, 1996, may be forfeited, withheld,
or restored in accordance with the terms of the Nebraska Treatment and
Corrections Act.
(9) Pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the probation
administrator and the director, an individualized post-release
supervision plan shall be collaboratively prepared by the Office of
Probation Administration and the department and provided to the court to
prepare individuals under custody of the department for post-release
supervision. All records created during the period of incarceration shall
be shared with the Office of Probation Administration and considered in
preparation of the post-release supervision plan.
Sec. 3. Section 83-1,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,135 Sections 83-170 to 83-1,135.05 and section 1 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections
-6-

LB994 LB994
2026 2026
Act.
Sec. 4. Original section 83-1,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 83-1,107, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-